Utah statutes.
20A-6-303.   Regular general election -- Ballot sheets.

(1)  Each election officer shall ensure that:

(a)  copy on the ballot sheets or ballot labels, as applicable, are arranged in approximately the same order as paper ballots;

(b)  the titles of offices and the names of candidates are printed in vertical columns or in a series of separate pages;

(c)  the ballot sheet or any pages used for the ballot label are of sufficient number to include, after the list of candidates:

(i)  the names of candidates for judicial offices and any other nonpartisan offices; and

(ii)  any ballot propositions submitted to the voters for their approval or rejection;

(d) (i)  a voting square or position is included where the voter may record a straight party ticket vote for all the candidates of one party by one mark or punch; and

(ii)  the name of each political party listed in the straight party selection area includes the word "party" at the end of the party's name;

(e)  the tickets are printed in the order specified under Section 20A-6-305;

(f)  the office titles are printed immediately adjacent to the names of candidates so as to indicate clearly the candidates for each office and the number to be elected;

(g)  the party designation of each candidate is printed immediately adjacent to the candidate's name; and

(h) (i)  if possible, all candidates for one office are grouped in one column or upon one page;

(ii)  if all candidates for one office cannot be listed in one column or grouped on one page:

(A)  the ballot sheet or ballot label shall be clearly marked to indicate that the list of candidates is continued on the following column or page; and

(B)  approximately the same number of names shall be printed in each column or on each page.

(2)  Each election officer shall ensure that:

(a)  proposed amendments to the Utah Constitution are listed in accordance with Section 20A-6-107;

(b)  ballot propositions submitted to the voters are listed in accordance with Section 20A-6-107; and

(c)  bond propositions that have qualified for the ballot are listed under the title assigned to each bond proposition under Section 11-14-206.

